Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.090

Voting systems—Maintenance of documents.

In counties using voting systems, the county auditor shall maintain the following documents for at least sixty days after the primary or election:

(1) Sample ballot formats together with a record of the format or formats assigned to each precinct;

(2) All programming material related to the control of the vote tallying system for that primary or election; and

(3) All test materials used to verify the accuracy of the tabulating equipment as required by RCW 29A.12.130.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1509. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 61; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 94. Formerly RCW 29.54.170.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.